Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 2

Miscellaneous Duties and Powers

17-1-201. Attendance at court required.

Every judge and chancellor is required to hold the terms of courts for which the judge or chancellor is responsible at the regular times appointed by law, unless prevented by sickness of the judge or the judge's family or by some other unavoidable necessity.

Code 1858, § 3937 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 39, § 2); Shan., § 5741; Code 1932, § 9933; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-106.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 617.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

Collateral References. 48 C.J.S. Judges § 40.

17-1-202. Penalty for failure to open court.

Any judge or chancellor who fails to open court for which the judge or chancellor is responsible within the first three (3) days of each regular term, without sufficient excuse, shall have one hundred dollars ($100) of salary deducted for the failure.

Code 1858, § 3939 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 39, § 1); Shan., § 5743; Code 1932, § 9934; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-107.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

Collateral References. 48 C.J.S. Judges §§ 62, 70, 71.

17-1-203. Powers in other districts.

The judges and chancellors are, notwithstanding §17-1-102, judges and chancellors for the state at large, and as such, may, upon interchange and upon other lawful ground, exercise the duties of office in any other judicial district in the state.

Code 1858, § 3915 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; 1826, ch. 2, § 2; 1855-1856, ch. 24); Shan., § 5708; Code 1932, § 9894; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 9.

Cited: Jordan v. Knox County, 213 S.W.3d 751, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 26 (Tenn. 2007).

17-1-204. Extraordinary process.

The judges and chancellors shall have interchangeable and concurrent jurisdiction to grant injunctions, attachments and all other extraordinary process, issuable out of, and returnable to, any of the circuit or chancery courts of this state.

Upon making the requisite fiats for, and granting such extraordinary process, it shall be the duty of the judge or chancellor to enclose the papers accompanying the application and the order made, in a sealed envelope, directed to the clerk of the court to which the fiat is directed, which envelope shall be opened only by the clerk or the clerk's deputy.

Code 1858, §§ 3946, 3947 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 71, § 3; 1835-1836, ch. 4, § 9); Shan., §§ 5750, 5751; Code 1932, §§ 9946, 9947; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-109.

Cross-References. Extraordinary process, §§29-1-103 —29-1-109.

Vacancy in office of sheriff, appointment of process servers, §8-8-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 15 Tenn. Juris., Injunctions, §§ 2, 24.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

17-1-205. Appointment of receivers.

The judges of the circuit courts and chancellors may also concurrently appoint receivers in vacation, whenever necessary in the proceedings of either the circuit or chancery courts, and the clerks of the courts, when required by the fiat, shall take bond with good security, from the receiver or applicant, as the case may be, for the faithful discharge of the duties of receiver.

Code 1858, § 3948 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 47, § 1); Shan., § 5752; Code 1932, § 9948; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-110.

Cross-References. Vacancy in office of sheriff, appointment of process servers, §8-8-108.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 120, 359, 364.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

17-1-206. Marriage rites.

The several judges and chancellors of this state, including retired chancellors and retired judges of courts of record of this state and persons who were members of quarterly county courts or county commissions on August 1, 1984, are authorized to solemnize the rites of matrimony. For the purposes of this section, the several judges of the United States courts who are citizens of Tennessee are deemed to be judges of this state.

Code 1858, § 3949 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 168, § 4); Shan., § 5753; Code 1932, § 9949; Acts 1965, ch. 11, § 1; 1973, ch. 66, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-111; Acts 1985, ch. 223, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 376, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Persons who may solemnize marriages, §36-3-301.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.